Rhode Island, session 2025, SB794.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
27-18-95. Emergency medical services transport to alternate facilities.
(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the practitioners, ambulance vehicles,
and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide
emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation
of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS responding to the 911 system established
under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(2) "Emergency medical services practitioner" means an individual who is licensed in
accordance with state laws and regulations to perform emergency medical care and preventive care
to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including emergency medical
technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians
cardiac, and paramedics.
(3) “Mobile integrated healthcare community paramedicine” means the provision of
healthcare using patient-centered, mobile resources in the out-of-hospital environment pursuant to
an EMS agency’s plan approved by the department of health utilizing licensed paramedic and
advanced emergency medical technician-cardiac practitioners working in collaboration with
physicians, nurses, mid-level practitioners, community health teams and social, behavioral and

substance use disorder specialists to address the unmet needs of individuals experiencing
intermittent health care issues.
(b) Only those emergency medical services (EMS) agencies who submit plans that meet
the minimum requirements for participation set and approved by the department of health shall be
eligible to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program.
(c) This section authorizes emergency medical services in the state that are approved by
the department of health to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine
program to divert non-emergency basic life service calls from emergency departments within their
service area as provided by department of health regulations. Pursuant to an EMS agency’s
approved plan, emergency medical services practitioners shall assess individuals who are in need
of emergency medical services and apply the correct level of care thereafter, which may include
transport to an alternative facility deemed appropriate by the emergency medical services
practitioner. An alternative facility shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) An individual’s primary care provider;
(2) A community health clinic;
(3) An urgent care facility;
(4) An emergency room diversion facility, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(5) A community-based behavioral health facility designed to provide immediate
assistance to a person in crisis.
(d) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall administer the mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program
and shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures necessary
and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section. The requirements of
this section shall only apply to EMS agencies who apply for and receive approval from the
department of health to provide such services.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services shall provide coverage for transport to an alternative
location facility as identified in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse the EMS for such
services at the same rate as for a transport to an emergency department.
(f) If treatment at an alternative facility is deemed appropriate by the EMS practitioner, the
emergency medical service shall bill at the rate described in subsection (e) of this section, even if
an advanced life support assessment was provided.
(g) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
LC001167 - Page 2 of 15

regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
27-18-96. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
LC001167 - Page 3 of 15

regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
27-19-87. Emergency medical services transport to alternate facilities.
(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the practitioners, ambulance vehicles,
and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide
emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation
of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS responding to the 911 system established
under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(2) "Emergency medical services practitioner" means an individual who is licensed in
accordance with state laws and regulations to perform emergency medical care and preventive care
to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including emergency medical
technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians-
cardiac, and paramedics.
(3) “Mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine” means the provision of
healthcare using patient-centered, mobile resources in the out-of-hospital environment pursuant to
an EMS agency’s plan approved by the department of health utilizing licensed paramedic and
advanced emergency medical technician-cardiac practitioners working in collaboration with
physicians, nurses, mid-level practitioners, community health teams and social, behavioral and
substance use disorder specialists to address the unmet needs of individuals experiencing
intermittent health care issues.
(b) Only those emergency medical services (EMS) agencies who submit plans that meet
the minimum requirements for participation set and approved by the department of health shall be
eligible to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program.
(c) This section authorizes emergency medical services in the state who are approved by
the department of health to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine
program to divert non-emergency basic life service calls from emergency departments within their
service area as provided by department of health regulations. Pursuant to an EMS agency’s
approved plan, emergency medical services practitioners shall assess individuals who are in need
of emergency medical services and apply the correct level of care thereafter, which may include
transport to an alternative facility deemed appropriate by the emergency medical services
practitioner. An alternative facility shall include, but not be limited to:
LC001167 - Page 4 of 15

(1) An individual’s primary care provider;
(2) A community health clinic;
(3) An urgent care facility;
(4) An emergency room diversion facility, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(5) A community-based behavioral health facility designed to provide immediate
assistance to a person in crisis.
(d) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall administer the mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program
and shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures necessary
and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section. The requirements of
this section shall only apply to EMS agencies that apply for and receive approval from the
department of health to provide such services.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services shall provide coverage for transport to an alternative
location facility as identified in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse the EMS for such
services at the same rate as for a transport to an emergency department.
(f) If treatment at an alternative facility is deemed appropriate by the EMS practitioner, the
emergency medical service shall bill at the rate described in subsection (e) of this section, even if
an advanced life support assessment was provided.
(g) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
27-19-88. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
LC001167 - Page 5 of 15

(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
27-20-83. Emergency medical services transport to alternate facilities.
(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Emergency medical services practitioner" means an individual who is licensed in
accordance with state laws and regulations to perform emergency medical care and preventive care
to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including emergency medical
technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians-
cardiac, and paramedics.
(2) “Mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine” means the provision of
healthcare using patient-centered, mobile resources in the out-of-hospital environment pursuant to
LC001167 - Page 6 of 15

an EMS agency’s plan approved by the department of health utilizing licensed paramedic and
advanced emergency medical technician-cardiac practitioners working in collaboration with
physicians, nurses, mid-level practitioners, community health teams and social, behavioral and
substance use disorder specialists to address the unmet needs of individuals experiencing
intermittent health care issues.
(b) Only those emergency medical services (EMS) agencies who submit plans that meet
the minimum requirements for participation set and approved by the department of health shall be
eligible to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program.
(c) This section authorizes emergency medical services in the state who are approved by
the department of health to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine
program to divert non-emergency basic life service calls from emergency departments within their
service area as provided by department of health regulations. Pursuant to an EMS agency’s
approved plan, emergency medical services practitioners shall assess individuals who are in need
of emergency medical services and apply the correct level of care thereafter, which may include
transport to an alternative facility deemed appropriate by the emergency medical services
practitioner. An alternative facility shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) An individual’s primary care provider;
(2) A community health clinic;
(3) An urgent care facility;
(4) An emergency room diversion facility, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(5) A community-based behavioral health facility designed to provide immediate
assistance to a person in crisis.
(d) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall administer the mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program
and shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures necessary
and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section. The requirements of
this section shall only apply to EMS agencies that apply for and receive approval from the
department of health to provide such services.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services shall provide coverage for transport to an alternative
location facility as identified in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse the EMS for such
services at the same rate as for a transport to an emergency department.
(f) If treatment at an alternative facility is deemed appropriate by the EMS practitioner, the
LC001167 - Page 7 of 15

emergency medical service shall bill at the rate described in subsection (e) of this section, even if
an advanced life support assessment was provided.
(g) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
27-20-84. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
LC001167 - Page 8 of 15

advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
27-41-100. Emergency medical services transport to alternate facilities.
(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the practitioners, ambulance vehicles,
and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide
emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation
of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS responding to the 911 system established
under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(2) "Emergency medical services practitioner" means an individual who is licensed in
accordance with state laws and regulations to perform emergency medical care and preventive care
to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including emergency medical
technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians-
cardiac, and paramedics.
(3) “Mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine” means the provision of
healthcare using patient-centered, mobile resources in the out-of-hospital environment pursuant to
an EMS agency’s plan approved by the department of health utilizing licensed paramedic and
advanced emergency medical technician-cardiac practitioners working in collaboration with
physicians, nurses, mid-level practitioners, community health teams and social, behavioral and
substance use disorder specialists to address the unmet needs of individuals experiencing
intermittent health care issues.
(b) Only those emergency medical services (EMS) agencies who submit plans that meet
the minimum requirements for participation set and approved by the department of health shall be
eligible to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program.
(c) This section authorizes emergency medical services in the state who are approved by
the department of health to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine
program to divert non-emergency basic life service calls from emergency departments within their
service area as provided by department of health regulations. Pursuant to an EMS agency’s
approved plan, emergency medical services practitioners shall assess individuals who are in need
LC001167 - Page 9 of 15

of emergency medical services and apply the correct level of care thereafter, which may include
transport to an alternative facility deemed appropriate by the emergency medical services
practitioner. An alternative facility shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) An individual’s primary care provider;
(2) A community health clinic;
(3) An urgent care facility;
(4) An emergency room diversion facility, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(5) A community-based behavioral health facility designed to provide immediate
assistance to a person in crisis.
(d) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall administer the mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program
and shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures necessary
and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section. The requirements of
this section shall only apply to EMS agencies that apply for and receive approval from the
department of health to provide such services.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services shall provide coverage for transport to an alternative
location facility as identified in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse the EMS for such
services at the same rate as for a transport to an emergency department.
(f) If treatment at an alternative facility is deemed appropriate by the EMS practitioner, the
emergency medical service shall bill at the rate described in subsection (e) of this section, even if
an advanced life support assessment was provided.
(g) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
27-41-101. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
LC001167 - Page 10 of 15

evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2026, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 5. Chapter 42-7.2 of the General Laws entitled "Office of Health and Human
Services" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
42-7.2-21. Emergency medical services transport to alternate facilities.
(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the practitioners, ambulance vehicles,
and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide
emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation
of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS responding to the 911 system established
LC001167 - Page 11 of 15

under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(2) "Emergency medical services practitioner" means an individual who is licensed in
accordance with state laws and regulations to perform emergency medical care and preventive care
to mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including emergency medical
technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians-
cardiac, and paramedics.
(3) “Mobile integrated healthcare community paramedicine” means the provision of
healthcare using patient-centered, mobile resources in the out-of-hospital environment pursuant to
an EMS agency’s plan approved by the department of health utilizing licensed paramedic and
advanced emergency medical technician-cardiac practitioners working in collaboration with
physicians, nurses, mid-level practitioners, community health teams and social, behavioral and
substance use disorder specialists to address the unmet needs of individuals experiencing
intermittent health care issues.
(b) Only those emergency medical services (EMS) agencies who submit plans that meet
the minimum requirements for participation set and approved by the department of health shall be
eligible to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program.
(c) This section authorizes emergency medical services in the state that are approved by
the department of health to participate in a mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine
program to divert non-emergency basic life service calls from emergency departments within their
service area as provided by department of health regulations. Pursuant to an EMS agency’s
approved plan, emergency medical services practitioners shall assess individuals who are in need
of emergency medical services and apply the correct level of care thereafter, which may include
transport to an alternative facility deemed appropriate by the emergency medical services
practitioner. An alternative facility shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) An individual’s primary care provider;
(2) A community health clinic;
(3) An urgent care facility;
(4) An emergency room diversion facility, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(5) A community-based behavioral health facility designed to provide immediate
assistance to a person in crisis.
(d) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall administer the mobile integrated healthcare/community paramedicine program
and shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures necessary
and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section. The requirements of
LC001167 - Page 12 of 15

this chapter shall only apply to EMS agencies who apply for and receive approval from the
department of health to provide such services.
(e) Rhode Island Medicaid and its contracted managed care entities shall provide coverage
for transport to an alternative facility as identified in subsection (c) of this section and shall
reimburse the EMS for such services at the same rate as for a transport to an emergency department.
(f) If treatment at an alternative facility is deemed appropriate by the EMS practitioner, the
emergency medical service shall bill at the rate described in subsection (e) of this section, even if
an advanced life support assessment was provided.
(g) The executive office of health and human services shall set the reimbursement rates for
the services described in this section.
42-7.2-22. Coverage for emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Rhode Island Medicaid and its contracted managed care entities shall provide coverage
for transportation, evaluation, and treatment described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and
shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same service would have been had that
service been delivered in a traditional office setting or for transport to an emergency department.
(e) The executive office of health and human services shall set the reimbursement rates for
the services described in this section.
LC001167 - Page 13 of 15

SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001167
========
LC001167 - Page 14 of 15